Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB51.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Property Tax Pension Obligation Disclosure Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commission." The State Real Estate Commission of the Commonwealth."Other postemployment benefit." A benefit such as a death benefit, life insurance, disability and long-term care that is paid in the period after employment and provided separately from a pension plan, as well as a health care benefit paid in the 12345678910111213141516171819 period after employment, regardless of the manner provided. The term does not include any termination benefit or termination payment for sick leave."Pension." Retirement income and, if provided through a pension plan, a postemployment benefit other than retirement income, including a death benefit, life insurance and a disability benefit. The term does not include a postemployment health care benefit or termination benefit.Section 3. Duties of school districts.(a) Calculation of unfunded pension and other postemployment benefit obligations.--Not later than September 30 each year, the governing body of a school district shall calculate the amount of unfunded pension and other postemployment benefit obligations per $100,000 of assessed residential property within the school district.(b) Publication of annual notice.--The results of the calculation under subsection (a) shall be published as follows:(1) On the publicly accessible Internet website of the school district as a separate item from other information on the website.(2) As a footnote in the financial disclosures of the annual audited report of the school district.(3) In the notice of taxes required under section 6 of the act of May 25, 1945 (P.L.1050, No.394), known as the Local Tax Collection Law.Section 4. Property disclosure statement.A seller that intends to transfer an interest in real property shall disclose the results of the calculation under section 3(a) as an item on the property disclosure form required under 68 Pa.C.S. § 7304 (relating to disclosure form).20250HB0051PN0041 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 5. Duty of commission.The commission shall, within 90 days of the effective date of this section, revise the form of the property disclosure statement under 68 Pa.C.S. § 7304 (relating to disclosure form) in order to include the results of the calculation required under section 3(a) as an item on the form and transmit the revised form to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication as a notice in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect as follows:(1) Section 4 shall take effect six months after publication of the notice under section 5.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0051PN0041 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516